Massachusetts, session 194th, S2038.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3(B)(a)(15) of Chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in place thereof
the following paragraph:-
Amounts expended by an individual for tolls paid for through a Fast Lane account or for
weekly or monthly transit commuter passes for Massachusetts Bay Transit Authority transit, bus,
commuter rail or commuter boat, not including amounts reimbursed by an employer or
otherwise. In the case of a single person or a married person filing a separate return or a head of
household, this deduction shall apply only to the portion of the expended amount that exceeds
$150, and the total amount deducted shall not exceed $1500. In the case of a married couple
filing a joint return, this deduction shall apply only to the portion of the amount expended by
of 2

each individual that exceeds $150, and the total amount deducted shall not exceed $1500 for
each individual. Individuals purchasing weekly or monthly passes for the commuter rail may
deduct an additional 10 percent of their yearly costs, not to exceed an additional $500 deducted
for each individual.
SECTION 2. The commissioner of revenue shall adopt regulations necessary for the
implementation of this act.
of 2